Hawaii, session 2026, SB695.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 321, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part XVIII to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§321-    Ground ambulances; camera requirement.  The department shall require each ground ambulance to be equipped with a front- and rear-facing camera for the purpose of recording incidents of any driver of a vehicle in violation of section 291C-65 or 291C-128." SECTION 2. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to equip ground ambulances with front- and rear-facing cameras. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of health for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________